Utah statutes.
17-3-4.   County seat, selection by election -- First officers -- Election.
Whenever a new county shall have been created under the provisions of this
chapter, the county legislative body of the county from which territory has
been taken to create such new county shall provide for an election to select a
county seat therefor and to elect officers for the new county; provided, that
whenever the petitions provided for in this chapter shall be presented to any
county legislative body during a year when no general election is held they
shall call a special election to select a county seat and county officers for
such new county, such election to be held on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday of November following and to be conducted under the laws providing for
general elections. The city or town receiving the largest number of votes
therefor shall be the county seat of the new county.
